Nevada, session 83, SB163.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
1 Section 1. NRS 178.487 is hereby amended to read as follows:
2 178.487 Every release on bail with or without security is
3 conditioned upon the defendant’s good behavior while so released,
4 and upon a showing that the proof is evident or the presumption
5 great that the defendant has committed a felony during the period of
6 release, the defendant’s bail [may] must be revoked, after a hearing,
7 by the magistrate who allowed it or by any judge of the court in
8 which the original charge is pending [. Pending such revocation,]
9 and the defendant [may] must be held without further bail [by order
10 of the magistrate before whom the defendant is brought after an
-
*SB163*

– 2 –
1 arrest upon the second charge.] pending trial of the offense for
2 which the revocation was ordered by the court.
3 Sec. 2. NRS 178.4855 is hereby repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
178.4855 Limitations on release without bail of certain
defendants who are taken into custody while admitted to bail on
other charges; notice to bail agent required. A defendant
charged with the commission of a category A or B felony who is
admitted to bail on a surety bond and who:
1. While admitted to bail, is taken into custody in the same
jurisdiction in which the defendant was admitted to bail and is
charged with the commission of another category A or B felony; and
2. Is ordered to be released from custody without bail,
 must not be released from custody pursuant to NRS 178.4851 until the
law enforcement agency that conducted the initial booking procedure for
the defendant for the subsequent felony has notified the bail agent that
issued the surety bond of the release of the defendant.
H
-
*SB163*